Maine, session 132, LD105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §12103-B is enacted to read:
§12103-B. International Medical Graduates Sponsorship Program
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Internationally trained physician" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section
3271, subsection 8, paragraph A, subparagraph (1).
B. "Physician shortage area" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 3271,
subsection 8, paragraph A, subparagraph (4).
C. "Sponsoring institution" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 3271,
subsection 8, paragraph A, subparagraph (5).
2. Program established. The International Medical Graduates Sponsorship Program,
referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the authority to make
grants to sponsoring institutions to provide an alternative license pathway for
internationally trained physicians in this State and to expand the number of physicians
practicing in physician shortage areas. The authority shall administer the program in
accordance with the requirements of this section.
3. Administration. Under the program, the authority shall use available funding to
establish up to a total of 10 positions annually at one or more sponsoring institutions for
the employment and training of internationally trained physicians issued a temporary
educational license to practice medicine pursuant to Title 32, section 3271, subsection 8,
paragraph B. The authority shall enter into an agreement with each sponsoring institution
that seeks to participate in the program.
4. Application. An internationally trained physician shall apply directly to a rural
graduate medical education collaborative in the State for screening and placement by using
a process and qualifying criteria developed by a rural graduate medical education
collaborative in the State.
5. Fund created. A nonlapsing, interest-earning, revolving fund under the jurisdiction
of the authority, known as the International Medical Graduates Sponsorship Program Fund
and referred to in this subsection as "the fund," is created to carry out the purposes of this
section. Any unexpended balance in the fund carries over for continued use under this
section. The authority may receive, invest and expend on behalf of the fund money from
gifts, grants, bequests and donations or other sources in addition to money appropriated or
allocated by the State. Money in the fund must be invested by the authority, as provided
by law, with the earned income to be added to the fund. Money received by the authority
on behalf of the fund must be used for reasonable administrative expenses and for the
purposes of this section.
6. Rules. The authority may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §3271, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0193(01)

8. Alternative license pathway for internationally trained physicians.
Notwithstanding any other requirements of this chapter, the board shall provide an
alternative license pathway for an internationally trained physician who has been licensed
or otherwise authorized to practice medicine in a country other than the United States and
who meets the requirements of this subsection to apply for and obtain a full and unrestricted
license to practice medicine in this State.
A. For the purposes of this subsection, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
(1) "Internationally trained physician" means a physician who has received a
degree of doctor of medicine or its equivalent from a legally chartered medical
school outside the United States recognized by the World Health Organization or
its successor organization; who has been licensed or otherwise authorized to
practice medicine in a country other than the United States; and who has practiced
medicine for at least one year.
(2) "Medical licensing examination" means the United States Medical Licensing
Examination or its successor examination.
(3) "Participating health care facility" means a health care facility approved by the
board that provides a program for internationally trained physicians according to
criteria developed or approved by the board and that provides medical care in a
physician shortage area.
(4) "Physician shortage area" means a geographic region or population in the State
experiencing a shortage of physicians relative to population and need, as
determined by the board.
(5) "Sponsoring institution" means any of the 4 hospitals in this State accredited
by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education on January 1, 2024.
B. An internationally trained physician may apply for a temporary educational license
to practice medicine for a renewable 2-year term if a sponsoring institution and the
internationally trained physician submit evidence acceptable to the board that the
internationally trained physician:
(1) Has lived in this State for at least 12 months;
(2) Has a valid certificate issued by the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates or its successor organization or other credential evaluation
service approved by the board, except that the board may waive such certification
at its discretion when the internationally trained physician is unable to obtain the
required documentation;
(3) Has achieved a passing score on both Step 1 and on Step 2 CK of the medical
licensing examination;
(4) Has entered into an agreement with the sponsoring institution providing that a
participating health care facility shall develop, assess and evaluate the
internationally trained applicant's familiarity with nonclinical skills and standards
appropriate for the practice of medicine in the State, according to assessment and
evaluation criteria developed or approved by the board;
Page 2 - 132LR0193(01)

(5) Has agreed to enter a full-time employment relationship with the sponsoring
institution after the board issues to the internationally trained physician a
temporary educational license pursuant to this paragraph; and
(6) Has satisfied any other criteria that may be developed by the board that the
board considers necessary.
C. A temporary educational license to practice medicine granted by the board under
paragraph B may be renewed twice, for a total of 6 years.
D. An internationally trained physician who provides the board with proof of
successful completion of the sponsoring institution's program under paragraph B and a
passing score on Step 3 of the medical licensing examination is eligible to apply for a
renewable 2-year license to practice medicine only at a participating health care facility
in a physician shortage area designated by the board, and that license authorizes the
physician to practice medicine independently in a primary care setting or a specialty
approved by the board.
E. After practicing medicine pursuant to a license issued by the board under paragraph
D for a minimum of 6 years, an internationally trained physician may apply for and the
board may issue a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in accordance with
this subsection.
F. Beginning January 1, 2027 and biennially thereafter, the board shall report to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over matters related to
the licensing of physicians on the status of the International Medical Graduates
Sponsorship Program established in Title 20-A, section 12103-B and the alternative
license pathway established in this subsection. The board shall report on the number of
internationally trained physicians participating in the program and the progress of those
physicians toward obtaining full and unrestricted licenses to practice medicine in this
State. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over matters
related to the licensing of physicians may report out legislation based on the report
submitted in accordance with this paragraph to the session of the Legislature in which
the report is submitted.